src/fst/morphology/incoming/bla_verb_test.lexc
LEXICON PV_COUNTER
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PREVERBS ;
@R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PREVERBS ;

!! Next come the Blackfoot verb stems. They are organized by their inflectional classes.

LEXICON VERB_STEMS
! LEXICON PREFIXES
@R.class.VAI@	VAI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VII@	VII_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTI@	VTI_STEMS ;
@R.class.VTA@	VTA_STEMS ;

LEXICON VAI_STEMS
aanii:waanii	VAI ;
!iksikka'yi:i2ksikka'yi	VAI ;
itapoo:itapoo	VAI ;
waahkayi:waahkayi	VAI ;
a'po'taki:a'po'taki
yo'kaa:yo'kaa	VAI ;
ooyi:i2oyi	VAI ;
!ipii:i2pii	VAI ;
okska'si:okska'si	VAI ;
!ohpo'kiiyoo:hpo'kiiyoo	VAI ;
!mo'taki:mo'taki	VAI ;
!inihki:i2nihki	VAI ;
!okstaki:a2kstaki	VAI ;
!okaa:a2kaa	VAI ;
!aanistá'pssi:aanistá'pssi	VAI ;

LEXICON VII_STEMS
aanistá'pii:aanistá'pii	VII ;
inááttsi:i2nááttsi	VII ;
sstoyii:sstoyii	VII ;
!innoyi:i2nnoyi	VII ;

LEXICON VTI_STEMS
!aanistsoo:aanistsoo	VTI ;
ini:i2ni	VTI ;
oowatoo:i2owatoo	VTI ;
issksini:i2ssksini VTI ;

LEXICON VTA_STEMS
!ipasskat:i2passkat	VTA ;
!ohkot:hkot	VTA ;
ikákomimm:i2kákomimm	VTA ;
ino:i2no	VTA ;
a'po'to:a'po'to	VTA ;
oowat:i2owat	VTA ;


! I am including the concrete verb finals (see Frantz 201' chapter 18.)
! The reason being that this is the best place to control them considering the four verb classes
! The reflexive changes VTA verbs into VAI verbs and takes VAI suffixes. The same is true of the reciprocal. 
! The benefactive changes Intransitive to Transitive verbs.

! I am also using nominalization morphology that is said to still be productive. Morphology that is no longer productive 
! is assumed to be already present in the noun model. 

LEXICON VAI
@R.pos.NA@+VAI:@R.pos.NA@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.NI@+VAI:@R.pos.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VAI_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VII
@R.pos.NA@+VII:@R.pos.NA@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.NI@+VII:@R.pos.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VII_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VTI
@R.pos.NA@+VTI:@R.pos.NA@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.NI@+VTI:@R.pos.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VTI_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VTA
@R.pos.NA@+VTA:@R.pos.NA@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.NI@+VTA:@R.pos.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VTA_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VAI_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@0                                           VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI+Der/Caus:@R.pos.VERB@%>áttsi                            VTA ;
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI+Der/Caus2:@R.pos.VERB@%>pi                               VTA ; ! Rare, give low weight
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo  VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o   VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@R.accomp.A@+VAI+Accomp:@R.pos.VERB@@R.accomp.A@%>m	         VAI_SUFFIXES ; ! -> VTA?

LEXICON VII_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VII:@R.pos.VERB@0		VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VTI_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VTI:@R.pos.VERB@0                                           VTI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo  VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o   VTA_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VTA_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@0                        VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo         VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo        VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o          VTA_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rflx+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>ohsi      VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>otsiiyi   VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>tsiiyi    VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! BELOW ARE THE VAI SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VAI_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IMP@+Imp:@R.mode.IMP@ IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Third Person Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawa ENCLITICS ;
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@0   	ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@0   		ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yini   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnaana  ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>o'pa	 ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>hpoaawa	 ANIM_INTERR ;  	
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi   	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>hsi   	ENCLITICS ; 
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>hsi  	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Sg:@R.person.OT@%>hsi 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>hsinnaana  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi 	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>hsoaayi	 ENCLITICS ;  
@R.person.OT@+3Pl:@R.person.OT@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>iniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>iniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>si   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>si   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>innaaniki  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>inoainiki ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>o'ki 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>si			ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>si			ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>htopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>htopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wahtopi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wahtopini   ENCLITICS ;	
! Plural UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnaanopi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>hpoaawopi 	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>wahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;   
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>wahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>wahtopiyini    ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular IMPERATIVE
+Sg:%>t	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural IMPERATIVE
+Pl:%>k	ENCLITICS ;

! BELOW ARE THE VII SUFFIXES

LEXICON VII_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES
! Inanimate Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waistsaawa ENCLITICS ;
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa		ENCLITICS ;
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi		ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.OT@+%0Sg:@R.person.OT@%>hsi 		ENCLITICS ;
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.OT@+%0Pl:@R.person.OT@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;	

LEXICON SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>si   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>si			ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON PREVERBS2
0 VERB_STEMS ;
